Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2351.
Creation and purpose of Council.

In order to promote and protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public, it is in the public interest to provide for the creation of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

The Council is created to:

encourage and assist municipalities, counties, and governmental agencies of this State in their efforts to improve the quality of law enforcement and citizen protection by maintaining a uniform standard of basic training for law enforcement applicants and in-service training for law enforcement officers; and

maintain statewide standards of law enforcement officer professional conduct by accepting and tracking complaints alleging officer unprofessional conduct, adjudicating charges of unprofessional conduct, and imposing sanctions on the certification of an officer who the Council finds has committed unprofessional conduct.

The Council shall offer and approve continuing programs of instruction in up-to-date methods of law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice.

It is the responsibility of the Council to encourage the participation of local governmental units in the program and to aid in the establishment of adequate training facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 57

, § 1;

1981, No. 104

, § 2;

2011, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2015;

2017, No. 56

, § 1;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2351a.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Executive officer” means the highest-ranking law enforcement officer of a law enforcement agency.

“Law enforcement agency” means the employer of a law enforcement officer.

“Law enforcement officer” means a member of the Department of Public Safety who exercises law enforcement powers; a member of the State Police; a Capitol Police officer; a municipal police officer; a constable who exercises law enforcement powers; a motor vehicle inspector; an employee of the Department of Liquor and Lottery who exercises law enforcement powers; an investigator employed by the Secretary of State; a Board of Medical Practice investigator employed by the Department of Health; an investigator employed by the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney; a fish and game warden; a sheriff; a deputy sheriff who exercises law enforcement powers; a railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to 5 V.S.A. chapter 68, subchapter 8; a police officer appointed to the University of Vermont’s Department of Police Services; or the provost marshal or assistant provost marshal of the Vermont National Guard.

“Off-site training” means training provided off the premises of a law enforcement officer training school and approved by the Council under the provisions of section 2355 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 56

, § 1; amended

2019, No. 73

, § 31;

2019, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2352.
Council membership.

The Vermont Criminal Justice Council shall consist of:
(a) (1) The Vermont Criminal Justice Council shall consist of:

the Commissioners of Public Safety, of Corrections, of Motor Vehicles, of Fish and Wildlife, and of Mental Health;

the Attorney General;

the Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs;

the Executive Director of Racial Equity;

a member of the Vermont Troopers’ Association or its successor entity, elected by its membership;

a member of the Vermont Police Association, elected by its membership;

a member of the Chiefs of Police Association of Vermont, appointed by the President of the Association;

a member of the Vermont Sheriffs’ Association, appointed by the President of the Association;

a law enforcement officer, appointed by the President of the Vermont State Employees Association;

an employee of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, appointed by the Executive Director of the League;

an individual appointed by the Executive Director of the Center for Crime Victim Services;

an individual appointed by the Executive Director of the Human Rights Commission;

an individual appointed by the Executive Director of the Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence; and

seven public members, appointed by the Governor, who shall not be law enforcement officers or have a spouse, parent, child, or sibling who is a law enforcement officer, current legislators, or otherwise be employed in the criminal justice system.

At least one of these members shall be a mental health crisis worker.

At least one of these members shall be an individual with a lived experience of a mental health condition or psychiatric disability.

At least two of these members shall be chosen from among persons nominated by the Vermont chapters of the NAACP, and each of these members shall represent a different Vermont NAACP chapter. In order to assist the Governor in making these appointments, each Vermont chapter of the NAACP shall nominate at least three individuals for these gubernatorial appointments.

A member’s term shall be three years.

The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Council from among the members set forth in subdivisions (1)(D) and (K)-(N) of this subsection.

Membership on the Council does not constitute the holding of an office for any purpose, and members of the Council shall not be required to take and file oaths of office before serving on the Council.

The members of the Council shall be entitled to receive per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under

32 V.S.A. § 1010

from monies appropriated to the Council.

A member of the Council shall not be disqualified from holding any public office or employment, and shall not forfeit any office or employment, by reason of his or her appointment to the Council, notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, or charter to the contrary.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 2, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1971, No. 120

, § 46(a);

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1979, No. 57

, § 2;

1983, No. 72

;

2003, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 56

, § 1;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Dec. 1, 2020.

§ 2353.
Repealed.
1973, No. 225 (Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2354.
Council meetings.

The Council shall meet at least once in each quarter of each year. Special meetings may be called by the Chair or upon the written request of six members of the Council.

The Council shall adopt rules as to quorum and procedures with respect to the conduct of its meetings and other affairs.

A member may designate in writing a person within his or her agency or association to attend a meeting or meetings of the Council. The designation shall be filed with the Chair of the Council.
(c) (1) A member may designate in writing a person within his or her agency or association to attend a meeting or meetings of the Council. The designation shall be filed with the Chair of the Council.

A person so designated shall have the same voting rights and responsibilities as the member at such meeting or meetings, but that designee shall not automatically assume the member’s place as an officer of the Council.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 4, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1971, No. 120

, § 46(b);

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1979, No. 57

, § 3;

1991, No. 50

, § 72a, eff. June 12, 1991;

2017, No. 56

, § 1.

§ 2355.
Council powers and duties.

The Council shall adopt rules with respect to:

the approval, or revocation thereof, of law enforcement officer training schools and off-site training programs, which shall include rules to identify and implement alternate routes to certification aside from the training provided at the Vermont Police Academy;

minimum courses of study, attendance requirements, and equipment and facilities to be required at approved law enforcement officer training schools and off-site training programs;

minimum qualifications for instructors at approved law enforcement officer training schools and off-site training programs;

minimum basic training for law enforcement officers in each level of law enforcement officer certification and the time within which that training shall be completed;

[Repealed.]

minimum annual in-service training requirements for law enforcement officers in each level of law enforcement officer certification;

minimum courses of training for other criminal justice personnel;

categories or classifications of advanced in-service training programs and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements with respect to those categories or classifications;

recertification of persons who have not been employed as law enforcement officers for a three-year period;

a definition of criminal justice personnel and criminal justice training for purposes of this title; and

[Repealed.]

permitting its Executive Director to grant up to a 60-day waiver to a law enforcement officer who has failed to meet his or her annual in-service training requirements but who is able to complete those training requirements within the time period permitted by the Executive Director.

The Council shall conduct and administer training schools and offer courses of instruction for law enforcement officers and other criminal justice personnel. The Council shall offer courses of instruction for law enforcement officers in different areas of the State and shall strive to offer nonovernight courses whenever possible.
(b) (1) The Council shall conduct and administer training schools and offer courses of instruction for law enforcement officers and other criminal justice personnel. The Council shall offer courses of instruction for law enforcement officers in different areas of the State and shall strive to offer nonovernight courses whenever possible.

The Council may also offer the basic officer’s course for preservice students and educational outreach courses for the public, including firearms safety and use of force.

The Council shall appoint, subject to the approval of the Governor, an Executive Director who shall be an exempt State employee and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the Council.
(c) (1) The Council shall appoint, subject to the approval of the Governor, an Executive Director who shall be an exempt State employee and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the Council.

The Executive Director shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Council.
(2) (A) The Executive Director shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Council.

The Executive Director may appoint officers, employees, agents, and consultants as he or she may deem necessary and prescribe their duties, with the approval of the Council.

The Executive Director is entitled to compensation as established by law and reimbursement for expenses within the amounts available by appropriation.

The Council may, in addition:

accept and administer under this chapter and for its purposes contributions, capital grants, gifts, services, and other financial assistance from any individual, association, corporation, or other organization having an interest in criminal justice training, and from this State and the United States and any of their agencies and instrumentalities, corporate or otherwise; and

perform such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Any agency or department of State, county, or municipal government may, notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, engage in and pay for, from sums appropriated for that purpose, training activities for employees in addition to any minimum training required by the Council.

The Council shall charge participants or employers of participants in law enforcement training programs as follows:

The tuition fees for any of the basic training or annual in-service training required under section 2358 of this chapter shall be set forth in rules adopted by the Council. The tuition fees shall be set to reflect the actual costs for operation of the particular programs offered. The fees for basic training shall not be charged for persons employed by police agencies at the time of training.

The tuition fees for training not required under section 2358 of this chapter shall be set to reflect the actual costs for operation of the particular programs offered, with an additional $30.00 entrance exam fee assessed on all training, except educational outreach courses for the public.

The Council shall develop and maintain a comprehensive drug training program.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 5, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1971, No. 120

, § 46(b), (c);

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1979, No. 57

, § 4;

1987, No. 34

, §§ 1, 2;

1993, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 68;

1997, No. 61

, § 70;

1999, No. 49

, § 185;

2005, No. 72

, § 6;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2015;

2017, No. 56

, § 1;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2356.
Repealed.
1979, No. 57, § 13(1).

§ 2357.
Powers and duties of the Executive Director.

The Executive Director of the Council, on behalf of the Council, shall have the following powers and duties, subject to the supervision of the Council and to be exercised only in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter:

to approve, on applications made in advance, criminal justice personnel training programs and their lesson plans and instructors, to issue certificates of approval to those programs, and to revoke those approvals or certificates;

to certify, as qualified, instructors at approved criminal justice personnel training schools and to issue appropriate certificates to those instructors;

to certify criminal justice personnel who have satisfactorily completed approved training programs and to issue appropriate certificates to them;

to cause studies and surveys to be made relating to the establishment, operation, and approval of criminal justice training schools;

to consult and cooperate with law enforcement officer criminal justice training schools:

to recommend a course of study in crime prevention for law enforcement students; and

for the development of advanced in-service training programs for law enforcement officers, which shall include a course of study on crime prevention;

to consult and cooperate with universities, colleges, and institutes for the development of specialized courses of study including a course of study on crime prevention, where appropriate;

to consult and cooperate with other departments and agencies of the State and federal government concerned with criminal justice personnel training;

[Repealed.]

to perform such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her powers and duties as set forth in this chapter;

to report to the Council at each regular meeting of the Council and at such other times as may be required; and

to approve and accept pre-service and military students for any of the basic training courses set forth in section 2358 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 7, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 282

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1971, No. 120

, § 46(b);

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1979, No. 57

, § 5;

1993, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 68;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 2015.

§ 2358.
Minimum training standards; definitions.

Unless waived by the Council under standards adopted by rule, and notwithstanding any statute or charter to the contrary, no person shall exercise law enforcement authority as a law enforcement officer without completing a basic training course and annual in-service training within a time and manner prescribed by the Council by rule.

The Council shall offer or approve basic training and annual in-service training for each of the following three levels of law enforcement officer certification in accordance with the scope of practice for each level, and shall determine by rule the scope of practice for each level in accordance with the provisions of this section:

Level I certification.

An applicant for certification as a Level I law enforcement officer shall first complete an off-site training program prior to entering and completing Level I basic training. Level I basic training shall include training to react to the circumstances described in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1).

The scope of practice of a Level I law enforcement officer shall be limited to security, transport, vehicle escorts, and traffic control, as those terms are defined by the Council, except that a Level I officer may react in the following circumstances if the officer determines that it is necessary to do any of the following:
(B) (i) The scope of practice of a Level I law enforcement officer shall be limited to security, transport, vehicle escorts, and traffic control, as those terms are defined by the Council, except that a Level I officer may react in the following circumstances if the officer determines that it is necessary to do any of the following:

protect an individual in the presence of the officer from the imminent infliction of serious bodily injury;

provide immediate assistance to an individual who has suffered or is threatened with serious bodily injury;

detain or arrest an individual who the officer reasonably believes has committed a crime in the presence of the officer; or

detain or arrest an individual who the officer reasonably believes has committed a felony under Vermont law.

If a Level I officer reacts to any of the circumstances described in subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B), he or she shall call upon an officer certified to respond and assume law enforcement authority over the incident.

Level II certification.

An applicant for certification as a Level II law enforcement officer shall first complete Level II basic training and may then become certified in a specialized practice area as set forth in subdivision (B)(ii) of this subdivision (2). Level II basic training shall include training to respond to calls regarding alleged crimes in progress and to react to the circumstances described in subdivision (B)(iii) of this subdivision (2).

Except as provided in subdivisions (ii) and (iii) of this subdivision (B), the scope of practice of a Level II law enforcement officer shall be limited to investigating the following matters:
(B) (i) Except as provided in subdivisions (ii) and (iii) of this subdivision (B), the scope of practice of a Level II law enforcement officer shall be limited to investigating the following matters:

[Repealed.]

7 V.S.A. § 658

(sale or furnishing to minors; enabling consumption by minors);

13 V.S.A. chapter 7 (advertisements);

13 V.S.A. chapter 8 (humane and proper treatment of animals);

13 V.S.A. §§ 505

(fourth degree arson), 508 (setting fires), and 509 (attempts);

13 V.S.A. chapter 19, subchapter 1 (riots);

13 V.S.A. §§ 1022

(noise in the nighttime), 1023 (simple assault), 1025 (recklessly endangering another person), 1026 (disorderly conduct), 1026a (aggravated disorderly conduct), 1027 (disturbing peace by use of telephone or other electronic communications), 1030 (violation of an abuse prevention order, an order against stalking or sexual assault, or a protective order concerning contact with a child), 1031 (interference with access to emergency services), 1042 (domestic assault), and 1062 (stalking);

13 V.S.A. chapter 35 (escape);

13 V.S.A. chapter 41 (false alarms and reports);

13 V.S.A. chapter 45 (flags and ensigns);

13 V.S.A. chapter 47 (frauds);

13 V.S.A. chapter 49 (fraud in commercial transactions);

13 V.S.A. chapter 51 (gambling and lotteries);

13 V.S.A. chapter 57 (larceny and embezzlement), except for subchapter 2 (embezzlement);

13 V.S.A. chapter 67 (public justice and public officers);

13 V.S.A. chapter 69 (railroads);

13 V.S.A. chapter 77 (trees and plants);

13 V.S.A. chapter 81 (trespass and malicious injuries to property);

13 V.S.A. chapter 83 (vagrants);

13 V.S.A. chapter 85 (weapons);

13 V.S.A. § 7559(d)

, (e), and (f) (violating condition of release);

18 V.S.A. §§ 4230(a)

and 4230d (cannabis possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4231(a)

(cocaine possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4232(a)

(LSD possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4233(a)

(heroin possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4234(a)

(depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4234a(a)

(methamphetamine possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4235(b)

(hallucinogenic drug possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4235a(a)

(ecstasy possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4476

(drug paraphernalia offenses);

20 V.S.A. § 3132

(firework prohibitions);

21 V.S.A. § 692(c)(2)

(criminal violation of stop-work order);

any misdemeanor set forth in Title 23 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated, except for 23 V.S.A. chapter 13, subchapter 13 (drunken driving),

23 V.S.A. § 3207a

(snowmobiling under the influence),

23 V.S.A. § 3323

(boating under the influence), or

23 V.S.A. § 3506(b)(8)

(operating an all-terrain vehicle under the influence);

any motor vehicle accident that includes property damage and injuries, as permitted by the Council by rule;

any matter within the jurisdiction of the Judicial Bureau as set forth in

4 V.S.A. § 1102

;

municipal ordinance violations;

any matter within the jurisdiction of a game warden or deputy game warden as set forth in 10 V.S.A. chapter 103, subchapter 4 (game wardens); and

any matter within the scope of practice of a Level I law enforcement officer.

In addition to the scope of practice permitted under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B), a Level II law enforcement officer may also practice in additional areas approved in writing by the Council based on a special certification or training approved by the Council.

Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in subdivisions (i) and (ii) of this subdivision (B), a Level II officer may respond to calls regarding alleged crimes in progress and may react in the following circumstances if the officer determines that it is necessary to do any of the following:

protect an individual in the presence of the officer from the imminent infliction of serious bodily injury;

provide immediate assistance to an individual who has suffered or is threatened with serious bodily injury;

detain or arrest an individual who the officer reasonably believes has committed a crime in the presence of the officer; or

detain or arrest an individual who the officer reasonably believes has committed a felony under Vermont law.

If a Level II officer responds to calls regarding alleged crimes in progress or reacts to any of the circumstances described in subdivision (iii) of this subdivision (B) and that response or reaction is outside the scope of his or her scope of practice, he or she shall call upon an officer certified to respond and assume law enforcement authority over the incident.

Level III certification.

An applicant for certification as a Level III law enforcement officer shall complete Level III basic training.

The scope of practice of a Level III law enforcement officer shall include all law enforcement authority.

All programs required by this section shall be approved by the Council.
(c) (1) All programs required by this section shall be approved by the Council.

The Council shall structure its programs so that on and after July 1, 2021, a Level II certified officer may use portfolio experiential learning or College Level Examination Program (CLEP) testing in order to transition to Level III certification, without such an officer needing to restart the certification process.

Completion of a program shall be established by a certificate to that effect signed by the Executive Director of the Council.

[Repealed.]

The criteria for all minimum training standards under this section shall include anti-bias training approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council and training on the State, county, or municipal law enforcement agency’s fair and impartial policing policy, adopted pursuant to subsection 2366(a) of this title.
(e) (1) The criteria for all minimum training standards under this section shall include anti-bias training approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council and training on the State, county, or municipal law enforcement agency’s fair and impartial policing policy, adopted pursuant to subsection 2366(a) of this title.

On or before December 31, 2018, law enforcement officers shall receive a minimum of four hours of training as required by this subsection.

In order to remain certified, law enforcement officers shall receive a refresher course on the training required by this subsection during every odd-numbered year in a program approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

The Criminal Justice Council shall, on an annual basis, report to the Racial Disparities in the Criminal and Juvenile Justice System Advisory Panel regarding:

the adoption and implementation of the Panel’s recommended data collection methods and trainings and policies pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 168(f)(2)

and (3);

the incorporation of implicit bias training into the requirements of basic training pursuant to this subsection; and

the implementation of all trainings as required by this subsection.

The criteria for all minimum training standards under this section shall include Advanced Roadside Impaired Driving Enforcement training as approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council. On or before December 31, 2021, law enforcement officers shall receive a minimum of 16 hours of training as required by this subsection.

The Council shall not offer or approve any training on the use of a chokehold as defined in section 2401 of this chapter, except for training designed to identify and prevent the use of chokeholds.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 189

, § 8, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 282

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1971, No. 120

, § 46(b);

1973, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1979, No. 57

, § 6;

1981, No. 104

, § 3;

1981, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), eff. Feb. 19, 1982;

1987, No. 34

, § 3;

1989, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 60

, § 4;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. July 1, 2010;

2011, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2015;

2015, No. 62

, § 6;

2015, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 23, 2016;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 14, 25, eff. May 31, 2016;

2017, No. 54

, § 2, eff. May 31, 2017;

2017, No. 56

, § 1;

2017, No. 83

, § 150;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2019, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 1, 2020;

2021, No. 27

, § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.

§ 2359.
Council services contingent on agency compliance.

On and after January 1, 2022, a law enforcement agency shall be prohibited from having its law enforcement applicants or officers trained by the Police Academy or from otherwise using the services of the Council if the agency is not in compliance with the requirements for collecting roadside stop data under section 2366 of this chapter, the requirement to report to the Office of Attorney General death or serious bodily injuries under

18 V.S.A. § 7257a(b)

, or the requirement to adopt, follow, or enforce any policy required under this chapter.

The Council shall adopt procedures to enforce the requirements of this section, which may allow for waivers for agencies under a plan to obtain compliance with this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2360.
Repealed.
1971, No. 7, § 3.

§ 2361.
Additional training.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits any law enforcement agency from providing additional training beyond basic training to its personnel where no certification is requested of or required by the Council or its Executive Director.

The executive officer of a law enforcement agency may seek certification from the Council for any in-service training he, she, or his or her designee may provide to law enforcement officers of his or her agency or of another agency, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 57

, § 7; amended

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2015;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2362.
Reports.

Within ten business days:

Elected constables. A town, village, or city clerk shall notify the Council, on a form provided by the Council, of the election, appointment to fill a vacancy under

24 V.S.A. § 963

, expiration of term, or reelection of any constable.

Appointed constables and police chiefs. The legislative body of a municipality or its designee shall notify the Council of the appointment or removal of a constable or police chief.

Municipal police officers. A police chief appointed under

24 V.S.A. § 1931

shall notify the Council of the appointment or removal of a police officer under the police chief’s direction and control.

State law enforcement officers. The appointing authority of a State agency employing a law enforcement officer shall notify the Council of the appointment or removal of a law enforcement officer employed by that agency.

Sheriffs’ officers. A sheriff shall notify the Council of the appointment or removal of a deputy or other law enforcement officer employed by that sheriff’s department.

Notification required by this section shall include the name of the constable, police chief, police officer, deputy, or other law enforcement officer, the date of appointment or removal, and the term of office or length of appointment, if any.

A report required by this section may be combined with any report required under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 57

, § 8; amended

2009, No. 14

, § 1;

2017, No. 56

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2018.

§ 2362a.
Potential hiring agency; duty to contact current or former agency.

Prior to hiring a law enforcement officer, the executive officer of a potential hiring law enforcement agency shall:
(a) (1) Prior to hiring a law enforcement officer, the executive officer of a potential hiring law enforcement agency shall:

require that officer to execute a written waiver that explicitly authorizes the officer’s:

current law enforcement agency employer to disclose its analysis of the officer’s performance at that agency, if the officer is still employed at that agency; or

last law enforcement agency employer to disclose the reason that officer is no longer employed by that agency, if the officer is not currently employed at an agency; and

contact that agency to obtain that disclosure and provide to that agency a copy of that written waiver.

An officer who refuses to execute the written waiver shall not be hired by the potential hiring agency.

If that current or former agency is a law enforcement agency in this State, the executive officer of that current or former agency or designee shall disclose to the potential hiring agency in writing its analysis of the officer’s performance at that agency or the reason the officer is no longer employed by the former agency, as applicable.
(b) (1) (A) If that current or former agency is a law enforcement agency in this State, the executive officer of that current or former agency or designee shall disclose to the potential hiring agency in writing its analysis of the officer’s performance at that agency or the reason the officer is no longer employed by the former agency, as applicable.

The executive officer or designee shall send a copy of the disclosure to the officer at the same time he or she sends it to the potential hiring agency.

Such a current or former agency shall be immune from liability for its disclosure described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, unless such disclosure would constitute intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence.

A potential hiring agency that receives a disclosure under subsection (b) of this section shall keep the contents of that disclosure confidential.

A collective bargaining agreement between a law enforcement agency and the exclusive representative or bargaining agent of the law enforcement officers employed by that agency shall not include a prohibition on the exchange of information between the employing agency and another agency about an officer’s performance at the employing agency.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 56

, § 1; amended

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2363.
Repealed. 2011, No. 63, § E.221.

§ 2364.
State Police, basic training.

Basic training programs for Vermont State Police officers, including curriculum, location, duration, and selection of instructors and other personnel, shall be developed and conducted by the Commissioner of Public Safety and submitted to the Criminal Justice Council for approval in accordance with the minimum standards adopted by rule under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 57

, § 17; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 163.

§ 2365.
Domestic violence training.

In order to remain certified, law enforcement officers shall receive by 2011 at least eight hours of domestic violence training in a program approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council and the Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence.

Law enforcement officers shall receive domestic violence retraining every two years in a program approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

The Vermont Police Academy shall employ a domestic violence trainer for the sole purpose of training Vermont law enforcement and related practitioners on issues related to domestic violence. Funding for this position shall be transferred by the Center for Crime Victim Services from the Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund created by

13 V.S.A. § 5360

.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § E.220.1, eff. June 3, 2010;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.220.4;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 82.

§ 2365a.
Search and rescue training.

A person shall receive search and rescue training approved by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council and the Vermont Search and Rescue Council as part of basic training in order to become certified as a law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 26

, § 2, eff. May 13, 2013.

§ 2365b.
Animal cruelty response training.

As part of basic training in order to become certified as a Level II and Level III law enforcement officer, a person shall receive a training module on animal cruelty investigations as developed and approved by the Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board and approved and administered by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

On or before December 31, 2023, humane officers as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 351(4)

(B)

shall complete an animal cruelty response training as developed and approved by the Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board and approved and administered by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council. The Council shall provide the training only to designated humane society employees, animal control officers appointed by the legislative body of a municipality, and other humane officers as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 351(4)

. The trainings shall be conducted on a periodic basis by qualified instructors as determined by the Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board.

The Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board may elect to require that humane officers as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 351(4)(B)

complete a refresher course on the training required by this section on a periodic basis. Such refresher training shall be developed and approved by the Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board and approved and administered by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

On or before January 1, 2024 and annually thereafter, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council shall provide the Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board with a list of the individuals that completed the trainings as required by this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2017; amended

2021, No. 38

, § 3.